Arkansas, session 2025, HB1189.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-17-2806(d), concerning the requirement
for novice teacher mentoring under the Teacher Excellence and Support System,
is amended to read as follows:
(d)(1) The Teacher Excellence and Support System also shall include
novice teacher mentoring for each novice teacher employed at the public
school that:
(1)(A) Provides training and support to novice teachers to
increase teacher retention;
(2)(B) Establishes norms of professionalism; and
(3)(C) Leads to improved student achievement by increasing
effective teacher performance.
(2) However, a novice teacher who has completed a Division of
Elementary and Secondary Education-approved year-long residency is not
required to participate in novice teacher mentoring under this subsection
(d).
*TNL109*
02-10-2025 10:16:58 TNL109

As Engrossed: H2/4/25 H2/5/25 H2/10/25 HB1189
/s/Vaught



































02-10-2025 10:16:58 TNL109